Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1633YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 280 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 7.19 Regulation of places and 1 practices of worship ââ limitation. 2 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 3 governor shall not close, place a mandate on, or otherwise 4 regulate a place or practice of worship for any reason, 5 including through the proclamation of a disaster emergency 6 pursuant to chapter 29C or public health disaster pursuant to 7 section 135.144. For the purposes of this section, âplace of 8 worshipâ means a building in which an active congregation is 9 devoted to worship. 10